Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7350 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
"Health care services" means all supplies, care, and services of
a medical, dental, behavioral health, mental health, substance use
disorder treatment, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic,
preventative, rehabilitative, or supportive nature, including
medication.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7351 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 14212 Page 1

A. It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce,
and a violation of the Consumer Protection Act as described in Title
15 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for any person to disseminate or cause
to be disseminated to the public any advertising about health care
services or proposed services performed in this state that is untrue
or clearly designed to mislead the public about the nature of the
services provided.
B. Such advertising includes representations made directly to
consumers, marketing practices, communication in any print medium,
such as newspapers, magazines, mailers, or handouts; and any
broadcast medium, such as television or radio, telephone marketing,
or advertising over the Internet, such as through social media,
websites, and web advertisements.
C. For purposes of this section, advertising about health care
services is an act in commerce.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7352 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Whenever the Attorney General or a district attorney has
reasonable cause to believe that a person has violated this section,
the Attorney General may issue a civil investigative demand.
B. The Attorney General or district attorney may commence an
action in any court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief

Req. No. 14212 Page 2

to c ompel compliance with the provisions of this section, and seek
civil penalties for violations.
C. Prior to commencing an action in court, the Attorney General
or district attorney shall give written notice to the person to cure
such violations not later than ten (10) business days after receipt
of the written notice.
D. Upon a finding by the court that a person has violated this
section, the state shall be entitled to recover:
1. Civil penalties of up to Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00)
for a first violation;
2. Civil penalties of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00)
for a second or subsequent violation; and
3. Reasonable attorney fees and costs.
E. In determining the overall amount of civil penalties to
assess against a person, the court shall include, but not be limited
to, the following in its consideration:
1. The nature and severity of the violation;
2. The size, scope, and type of the offending organization; and
3. The good-faith cooperation of the offending organization
with any investigations conducted by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to this section.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14212 TJ 12/11/25
Req. No. 14212 Page 3